Missouri, session 2026, HB3356.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 8, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 8.009, to read as follows:
8.009. Members of the general assembly shall have the authority to display the
2 state, national, and POW/MIA flags outside of their office doors.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.